Washington statutes.
RCW 19.120.100

Limitation period tolled.

The pendency of any civil, criminal, or administrative proceedings against a person brought by the federal or Washington state governments or any of their agencies under the anti-trust laws, the Federal Trade Commission Act, or any federal or state act related to anti-trust laws or to franchising, or under this chapter shall toll the limitation of this action if the action is then instituted within one year after the final judgment or order in such proceedings: PROVIDED, That said limitation of actions shall in any case toll the law so long as there is actual concealment on the part of the person.

[ 1986 c 320 s 11.]